Utah statutes.
76-2-307.   Voluntary termination of efforts prior to offense.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution in which an actor's criminal responsibility arises from his own conduct or from being a party to an offense under Section 76-2-202 that prior to the commission of the offense, the actor voluntarily terminated his effort to promote or facilitate its commission and either:

(1)  Gave timely warning to the proper law enforcement authorities or the intended victim; or

(2)  Wholly deprives his prior efforts of effectiveness in the commission.



Amended by Chapter 20, 1995 General Session

